Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 39. Vermont Student Apprenticeship Program

§ 1601.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Articulation agreement” means a written agreement between a secondary school and a postsecondary institution or registered apprenticeship program specifying the responsibilities for each party to the agreement with respect to student apprentices working towards completion of a registered apprenticeship program or a postsecondary degree. The agreement may include acceptance of a student apprentice into a registered apprenticeship program or postsecondary school pending completion of a student apprenticeship program.

“Industry competency standards” mean performance criteria developed jointly by educators and business representatives and adopted by the State Board that define skills and knowledge that are needed in the workplace.

“Registered apprenticeship” means an apprenticeship or on the job training program registered by the State Apprenticeship Council under

21 V.S.A. § 1102

in which a person enters into a contract to receive instruction and occupational preparation in a trade, craft, or business from an employer and is provided wages in consideration for services.

“Student apprentice” means an individual, enrolled in a school, who is participating in a student apprenticeship program approved by the regional advisory board and who is employed in accordance with the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.

“Student apprentice coordinator” means a licensed professional educator whom the State Board of Education finds qualified to plan, implement and evaluate a student apprenticeship program.

“Student apprenticeship program” means a skill-based education program that coordinates and integrates classroom instruction with a structured, work-based learning experience. An individual participating in a student apprenticeship program receives academic instruction and training in a skilled occupation that prepares him or her for postsecondary education, advanced training, or direct employment in a position higher than entry level.

“Worksite mentors” mean individuals employed by business and industry who have demonstrated mastery of their craft or profession, who have been prepared to carry out the role of student advisor, and who provide worksite learning experiences to student apprentices.

“Worksite training” means the part of the apprenticeship program conducted at the place of business or industry.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 17, 1994; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 159, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1602.
School board responsibilities.

A school board or its equivalent in any independent secondary school may establish and operate a student apprenticeship program under this chapter when the school board has received approval from the regional advisory board.

Each school board that runs a student apprenticeship program shall:

Employ a student apprenticeship coordinator who shall:

Find student apprenticeship opportunities for students.

Develop working relationships between the school and business community.

Select safe and appropriate worksites for student apprentices.

Work with businesses to identify worksite mentors.

Select, adapt and use curricula to meet the academic and career technical education needs of student apprentices.

Quarterly, review each student’s performance and the suitability of the program to the student’s needs. Report the results of the review to the regional advisory board pursuant to section 1605 of this title.

Annually, report to the regional advisory board concerning the effectiveness of the program pursuant to section 1605 of this title.

Ensure preparation of individuals employed by business to be worksite mentors according to guidelines established by the State Board. Each participating business shall support the preparation of the worksite mentor as a condition to participating in the student apprenticeship program.

Collaborate with and integrate the program with Vermont’s school-to-work system.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 17, 1994.

§ 1603.
Elements of the program.

An eligible student may apply to enter the student apprenticeship program upon successful completion of grade 10 or its equivalent and meeting entrance requirements established by the State Board of Education.

A program may be up to four years in length and shall require both academic study and work experience each program year. The program shall emphasize work-based learning, applied academics, team teaching, and other strategies that will enable the student apprentice to enter a postsecondary institution, a registered apprenticeship program, or the workforce in a position above entry level.

The school board, working with the student and the employer, shall prepare an apprenticeship agreement. The agreement shall describe the responsibilities of each party, including program requirements and remuneration to the student by the employer as determined jointly by the student, apprenticeship coordinator, and worksite mentor and shall be valid when signed by each party.

When an articulation agreement is requested and feasible, the school board shall negotiate one for apprentices working towards completion of registered apprenticeship or postsecondary degree requirements.

The student apprenticeship coordinator shall assist the student in maintaining a portfolio that shall include a log of work activities and the results of assessments conducted periodically during the program.

A student apprentice who successfully completes a student apprenticeship program shall receive an industry competency certificate issued by the State Board of Education. In order to earn an industry competency certificate, a student apprentice shall demonstrate mastery of industry competency standards and shall complete academic requirements for graduation.

A record of mastery of skills attained through the apprenticeship program and high school graduation credit shall be recorded in the student’s school record.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 17, 1994.

§ 1604.
State Board responsibilities.

The State Board of Education shall:

Establish standards of operation for a student apprenticeship program. Standards shall ensure that a program prepares students to meet labor market standards and needs, and that a student shall receive relevant and quality work experience.

Establish standards for entrance into a student apprenticeship program.

Establish a process for termination of a student from a student apprenticeship program.

In collaboration with related business or trade organizations, establish academic and occupation-specific industry competency standards for each occupation-specific student apprenticeship program offered in the State. The standards shall be those to be met in order to earn an industry competency certificate.

Establish guidelines for preparation of worksite mentors.

Certify those who graduate from a student apprenticeship program as meeting industry competency standards for entrance into the trade or profession the student has studied. The State Board shall maintain a record of certificates issued under this subdivision.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 17, 1994.

§ 1605.
Regional advisory board responsibilities.

Each regional advisory board shall:

Based on standards of operation established by the State Board of Education, approve or disapprove an application from a school board to establish and operate a student apprenticeship program. The Board may rescind approval if the program is not meeting the standards.

Based on standards and processes established by the State Board, determine which applicants shall be accepted into the student apprenticeship programs in its region and determine whether a student should be terminated from a program. Decisions regarding acceptance into a program shall, in part, be based on submission of an acceptable career preparation plan developed by the applicant with the help of a guidance counselor. Decisions regarding termination shall be made with the advice of the student apprenticeship coordinator.

Approve or disapprove proposed worksites and worksite mentors for student apprenticeship programs in its region.

At least quarterly, request information about each student from each student apprenticeship coordinator. The coordinator shall provide information concerning student performance, basic and advanced skill attainment, suitability of the worksite, and worksite mentor effectiveness.

At least annually, request program information from each student apprenticeship coordinator that will enable the Board to judge the overall effectiveness of each student apprenticeship program in its region. The coordinator shall provide information concerning program participation, program completion by students, business and industry participation, quality of instruction, success at combining classroom and worksite instruction, career placement, and employer satisfaction.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 17, 1994.